from-class.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Masc +Sɡ +Pl

LEXICON Root

Adj ;

LEXICON Adj

əkeʎ 		AdjInf;
siβil 		AdjInf;
ʃop			AdjInf;
əspɛs 		AdjInf;
baʃ 		AdjInf;
tot 		AdjInf;
pɔk 		AdjInf;
mal 		AdjInf;
əskerp	 	AdjInf;
sɛk 		AdjInf;
ɡros 		AdjInf;
koʃ 		AdjInf;
brut 		AdjInf;
nu	 		AdjInf;
əɡzaktə 	AdjInf;
suβlim	 	AdjInf;
kru 		AdjInf;
frənsez 	AdjInf;
kəzad 		AdjInf;
rɔʒ 		AdjInf;
orb 		AdjInf;
seɡ 		AdjInf;
ɡroɡ 		AdjInf;
kandid	 	AdjInf;
prəsiz	 	AdjInf;
ɡriz 		AdjInf;
bwit 		AdjInf;
boʒ 		AdjInf;
ʎarg 		AdjInf;
fəʃuɡ 		AdjInf;
puruɡ 		AdjInf;
frɛd 		AdjInf;
dropu 		AdjInf;
flɔɲd͡ʒu 		AdjInf;
səɣur 		AdjInf;
səɣəðor 	AdjInf;
san 		AdjInf;
bon 		AdjInf;
dur 		AdjInf;
klar 		AdjInf;
əlβin 		AdjInf;
plan 		AdjInf;
sərɛn 		AdjInf;
alt 		AdjInf;
fɔrt 		AdjInf;
sord 		AdjInf;
sant 		AdjInf;
prufund 	AdjInf;
kurt 		AdjInf;
bɛrd 		AdjInf;
kəlɛnt	 	AdjInf;
fəkund	 	AdjInf;
dulent	 	AdjInf;
blaŋk 		AdjInf;

LEXICON AdjInf

+Adj+Masc+Sg:0   #;
+Adj+Fem+Sg:ə    #;
